Washington statutes.
RCW 41.32.835

Choice of membership in plan 2 or plan 3.

(1) All teachers who first become employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, shall have a period of ninety days to make an irrevocable choice to become a member of plan 2 or plan 3. At the end of ninety days, if the member has not made a choice to become a member of plan 2, he or she becomes a member of plan 3 or plan 2 as follows:

(a) Becomes a member of plan 3 if first employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2007, but prior to July 1, 2020;

(b) Becomes a member of plan 2 if first employed by an employer in an eligible position on or after July 1, 2020.

(2) For administrative efficiency, until a member elects to become a member of plan 3, or becomes a member of plan 3 by default under subsection (1) of this section, the member shall be reported to the department in plan 2, with member and employer contributions. Upon becoming a member of plan 3 by election or by default, all service credit shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined benefit, and all employee accumulated contributions shall be transferred to the member's plan 3 defined contribution account.

[ 2019 c 313 s 1; 2007 c 491 s 3; 1995 c 239 s 105.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2007 c 491 ss 1, 3, and 7: "Sections 1, 3, and 7 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and take effect July 1, 2007." [ 2007 c 491 s 19.]

Severability—Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 491: See notes following RCW 41.32.765.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.